Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-352] Validity of special purpose
revenue bonds. The special purpose revenue bonds bearing the signature or
facsimile signature of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof
shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, notwithstanding that before the
delivery thereof and payment therefor, any or all the persons whose signatures
appear thereon shall have ceased to be officers of the department. Special
purpose revenue bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to
this part, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and of
the regularity of their issuance. [L 2012, c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next